Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.431

Manufactured home safety and construction standards—Enforcement by director of labor and industries.

The director of the department of labor and industries may enforce manufactured home safety and construction standards adopted by the secretary of housing and urban development under the national manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426). Furthermore, the director may make agreements with the United States government and private inspection organizations to implement the development and enforcement of applicable provisions of this chapter and the national manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426). Any fees or contract moneys collected under these agreements shall be deposited into the manufactured home installation training account created in RCW 43.22A.100.

[ 2007 c 432 s 6; 2001 c 335 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 21 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—2001 c 335: See note following RCW 43.22.335.

Construction—1977 ex.s. c 21: "This 1977 amendatory act is not intended to repeal, alter, or diminish existing state law respecting mobile homes, commercial coaches, and recreational vehicles in those areas unregulated under federal law." [ 1977 ex.s. c 21 s 4.]